Washington statutes.
RCW 18.32.0358

Commission successor to other boards.

The commission is the successor in interest of the board of dental examiners and the dental disciplinary board. All contracts, undertakings, agreements, rules, regulations, and policies continue in full force and effect on July 1, 1994, unless otherwise repealed or rejected by chapter 9, Laws of 1994 sp. sess. or by the commission.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 226.]